apertium-mt-he.mt.dix
  <pardef n="f/alz__adj_GD">
    <e><p><l>alz</l><r>alz<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>oloz</l><r>alz<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="ġ/did__adj_GD">
    <e><p><l>did</l><r>did<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>odda</l><r>did<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="ħ/ażin__adj_GD">
    <e><p><l>ażin</l><r>ażin<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>żiena</l><r>ażin<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="ġ/akketta__n_GD">
    <e><p><l>akketta</l><r>akketta<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>kieket</l><r>akketta<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="ċ/uċ__adj_GD">
    <e><p><l>uċ</l><r>uċ<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>wieċ</l><r>uċ<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="ħ/obla__adj_GD">
    <e><p><l>obla</l><r>obla<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>biel</l><r>obla<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>biela</l><r>obla<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>bieli</l><r>obla<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="s/abiħ__adj">
    <e><p><l>abiħ</l><r>abiħ<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>abiħa</l><r>abiħ<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>bieħ</l><r>abiħ<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="għ/ani__adj_GD">
    <e><p><l>ani</l><r>ani<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>onja</l><r>ani<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="b/aħnan__adj_GD">
    <e><p><l>aħnan</l><r>aħnan<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ħaħan</l><r>aħnan<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ħaħen</l><r>aħnan<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="q/alil__adj_GD">
    <e><p><l>alil</l><r>alil<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>liel</l><r>alil<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>


  <!-- SECTION: Interjections -->
  <pardef n="le__ij">
    <e><p><l/><r><s n="ij"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <!-- Abbreviations -->
  <pardef n="Dr__abbr">
    <e><p><l/><r><s n="abbr"/></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

</pardefs>

    <e lm="ġakketta" c="jacket" ><i>ġ</i><par n="ġ/akketta__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="falz" c="FALSE" ><i>f</i><par n="f/alz__adj_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="baħnan" c="fool" ><i>b</i><par n="b/aħnan__adj_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="għani" c="rich" ><i>għ</i><par n="għ/ani__adj_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ċuċ" c="idiot" ><i>ċ</i><par n="ċ/uċ__adj_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ħobla" c="pregnant" ><i>ħ</i><par n="ħ/obla__adj_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qalil" c="fierce" ><i>q</i><par n="q/alil__adj_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ġdid" c="new" ><i>ġ</i><par n="ġ/did__adj_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="sabiħ" c="beautiful" ><i>s</i><par n="s/abiħ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ħażin" c="bad" ><i>ħ</i><par n="ħ/ażin__adj_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="le"><i>le</i><par n="le__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="iva"><i>iva</i><par n="le__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="Dr"><i>Dr</i><par n="Dr__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="am"><i>am</i><par n="Dr__abbr"/></e>
    <e lm="pm"><i>pm</i><par n="Dr__abbr"/></e>
